Hawaii statutes.
§125C-23 Set-aside system. The state
energy resources coordinator shall adopt rules establishing a petroleum
products set-aside system. The purpose of this system shall be:

(1) The protection of public health, safety, and
welfare;

(2) The maintenance of public services, utilities,
and transportation, including emergency and essential intrastate air transport
services;

(3) The maintenance of agricultural operations,
including farming, horticulture, dairy, fishing, and related services;

(4) The preservation of economically sound and
competitive industry, through the equitable acquisition and distribution of
petroleum products; and

(5) The promotion of efficiency, with minimum
economic disruptions, during a shortage of petroleum products.

The rules establishing the set-aside system shall be
adopted in accordance with chapter 91. [L 1984, c 238, pt of §7; am L 1994, c
59, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next